Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.671

Withdrawal of registration.

In order to withdraw its registration, a foreign limited partnership must deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of withdrawal in accordance with RCW 23.95.530.

[ 2015 c 176 s 6125; 2009 c 188 s 907.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.